Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 17 Fixtures

34-17-1.
Factory equipment declared real estate.

The water wheels, steam engines, boilers, all shafting, whether upright or horizontal, and hangers for the same, except such as are used to drive a special machine, all drums, pulleys, wheels, gearing, steam pipes, gas pipes, gas fixtures, water pipes, and fixtures, kettles and vats, set and used in any mechanical or manufacturing establishment, are declared to be real estate whenever they belong to the owner of the real estate to which they are attached.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 200, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 251, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 295, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-17-1

.

34-17-2.
Machinery and apparatus declared personal property.

All other machinery, tools, and apparatus of every description, including all the articles specified in §

34-17-1

whenever they belong to some person other than the owner of the real estate to which they are attached, used, or employed in any manufacturing establishment, are declared to be personal estate, and as such shall be considered in attachments, and in all cases whatsoever; except that in the assessment of taxes such property shall be assessed as provided in chapter 4 of title 44.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 200, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 251, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 295, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 430, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-17-2

; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 27.

34-17-3.
Partition of machinery and apparatus.

Partition of the property mentioned in §

34-17-2

may be compelled between the owners thereof in the same manner as though the property were real estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 200, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 251, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 295, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 430, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-17-3

.

34-17-4.
Removal of fixtures annexed by life tenant.

Fixtures annexed to the freehold by a life tenant, or his or her assigns, may be removed during the continuance of the life estate, or within a reasonable time after its determination; and in determining what things so annexed are fixtures, the rules of the common law, which prevail as between the landlord and tenant for years, shall govern.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 201, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 252, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 296, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 430, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-17-4

.

34-17-5.
Testamentary powers unaffected by § 34-17-4.

Section

34-17-4

shall not affect the right of the owner of land to make a different arrangement by will or otherwise as to the removal of fixtures, nor shall it in any way impair or affect the provisions of any will or other instrument by which an estate for life in land is created or limited.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 201, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 252, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 296, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 430, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-17-5

.